Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1915
Successor in interest; rights; when available.

The rights afforded to a mortgagor or trustor under the Farm Homestead Protection Act shall be available for the protection of the homestead of his or her successor in interest in the mortgaged premises or trust property only if the successor has entered into an agreement signed and acknowledged by the mortgagee or beneficiary and by the successor for the assumption and full performance by the successor of the obligations secured by the mortgage or trust deed.

Laws 1986, Third Spec. Sess., LB 3, § 15.